Illinois, session 104th, SB1358.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Findings; purpose. 5    (a) The General Assembly finds the following: 6        (1) Positron emission tomography (PET) scans have been 7    proven as the most effective form of medical imaging for 8    detecting both tumors and cancer. Studies show that PET 9    scans have an almost 92.5% chance to successfully diagnose 10    malignancies. 11        (2) The risk of cancer and cancer diagnoses starts to 12    exponentially increase beginning at the age of 45 in both 13    men and women. 14        (3) PET scans are not covered as screening tests 15    unless the individual has Medicare or a physician orders a 16    PET scan. Because a person must be at least age 65 to be 17    eligible for Medicare and because many cancers are hard to 18    detect based on symptoms, thousands of cases of cancer are 19    undetected. 20        (4) By the time an individual is eligible to receive a 21    PET scan, the cancer is often too far progressed and 22    difficult to treat. 23    (b) The purposes of this Act are to: 24        (1) mandate insurance companies to cover the full cost   SB1358- 2 -LRB104 09465 BAB 19526 b1    of an annual PET scan to better public health; and2        (2) protect the health and welfare of older 3    constituents who are at a higher risk of cancer. 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 356z.80 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.80 new)7    Sec. 356z.80. Coverage of positron emission tomography. 8    (a) In this Section:9    "Positron emission" means a subtype of radioactive decay, 10also referred to as beta decay, that can be used to detect or 11reveal metabolic or biochemical functions of tissues.12    "Positron emission tomography" or "PET scan" means an 13imaging technique that uses radiotracers to analyze and 14measure differences in metabolic processes and other 15physiological processes.16    "Radiotracer" means a chemical compound where one or more 17atoms have been replaced by a radioisotope, helping in 18monitoring chemical reactions in the body.19    (b) A group or individual policy of accident and health 20insurance or a managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 21issued, or renewed on or after July 1, 2025 shall provide 22coverage for the full cost of an annual PET scan for insureds 23age 35 or older who elect to get a PET scan, regardless of 24whether the PET scan was ordered by a physician licensed to   SB1358- 3 -LRB104 09465 BAB 19526 b1practice medicine in all its branches and regardless of 2whether the insured displays symptoms. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.